Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6027.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 207. (1) A zoning ordinance or zoning decision shall must not have the effect of totally prohibiting the establishment of a land use within a local unit of government in the presence of a demonstrated need for that land use within either that local unit of government or the surrounding area within the this state, unless a location within the local unit of government does not exist where the use may be appropriately located or the use is unlawful. (2) A local unit of government shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance, rule, regulation, or decision, including, but not limited to, a zoning ordinance or decision, that has the effect of totally prohibiting short-term rentals within that local unit of government. (3) As used in this section, "short-term rental" means that term as defined in section 2 of the short-term rental act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03776'25) or House Bill No. 6026 (request no. H03776'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.